Maryland, session 2026, HB1185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
– 1 –

Ch. 559 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Public Utilities
16–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Commission” means the Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission.
18–120.1.
(A) BEFORE TAKING ANY DISCIPLINARY ACTION UNDER § 18–121 OR §
18–123 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) INVESTIGATE THE ALLEGED MISCONDUCT;
(2) MEET WITH THE EMPLOYEE;
(3) CONSIDER ANY MITIGATING CIRCUMSTANCES;
(4) DETERMINE THE APPROPRIATE DISCIPLINARY ACTION, IF ANY, TO
BE IMPOSED; AND
(5) GIVE THE EMPLOYEE A WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE DISCIPLINARY
ACTION TO BE TAKEN AND THE EMPLOYEE’S APPEAL RIGHTS.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY IMPOSE ANY DISCIPLINARY ACTION NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS
AFTER THE COMMISSION ACQUIRES KNOWLEDGE OF THE MISCONDUCT FOR WHICH
THE DISCIPLINARY ACTION IS IMPOSED.
(C) (1) THE COMMISSION MAY SUSPEND AN EMPLOYEE WITHOUT PAY
NOT LATER THAN 5 WORKDAYS FOLLOWING THE CLOSE OF THE EMPLOYEE’S NEXT
SHIFT AFTER THE COMMISSION ACQUIRES KNOWLEDGE OF THE MISCONDUCT FOR
WHICH THE SUSPENSION IS IMPOSED.
(2) SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AND EMPLOYEE LEAVE
DAYS ARE EXCLUDED IN CALCULATING THE 5–WORKDAY PERIOD UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION.
18–121.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 559
(a) (1) The Commission may suspend an employee for disciplinary purposes
for up to 30 days.
[(b)] (2) Each suspension shall be without pay.
[(c)] (3) An employee may not be suspended for disciplinary purposes for more
than 30 days in a calendar year.
(B) AN EMPLOYEE WHO IS SUSPENDED FOR DISCIPLINARY PURPOSES MAY
APPEAL TO THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
4–401 OF THE STATE PERSONNEL AND PENSIONS ARTICLE.
18–123.
(a) An employee may not be permanently removed except for cause and after an
opportunity to be heard.
(b) An employee who is permanently removed may appeal to the Office of
Administrative Hearings in accordance with § 4–401 of the State Personnel and Pensions
Article.
(c) An employee may not be permanently removed from the merit system because
of religious or political opinions or affiliations.
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
4–401.
The Office of Administrative Hearings shall dispose of a case or conduct a hearing
and issue a final decision in:
(1) a Whistleblower Law hearing under § 5–310 of this article;
(2) an appeal under Title 11 of this article of a disciplinary action;
(3) a grievance under § 12–205 of this article;
(4) AN APPEAL UNDER § 18–121 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE
FOR THE SUSPENSION OF AN EMPLOYEE OF THE WASHINGTON SUBURBAN
SANITARY COMMISSION; and
[(4)] (5) an appeal under § 18–123 of the Public Utilities Article for the
removal of an employee of the Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
– 3 –

Ch. 559 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 4 –